Vermont, session 2025-2026, S98.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Automatic Voter Registration * * *
Sec. 1. 17 V.S.A. § 2144a is amended to read:
§ 2144a. REGISTRATION
A person who desires to register to vote may apply in any of the following
ways:
(1) Simultaneously with his or her the person’s application for, or
renewal of,:
(A) a motor vehicle driver’s license or nondriver identification
card as provided in section 2145a of this chapter; or
(B) any services available pursuant to 33 V.S.A. chapter 12.
* * *
Sec. 2. 33 V.S.A. § 1205 is amended to read:
§ 1205. REQUIRED SERVICES TO PARTICIPATING FAMILIES
* * *
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 3 of 25
(c) The Commissioner shall ensure that the applications and forms used by
the Department for Reach Ahead services, including for the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program, automatically register the applicant to vote
pursuant to 17 V.S.A. § 2144a. The voter registration provision on any
application or form used by the Department for these services shall offer the
applicant the option to opt out of registering to vote.
Sec. 3. EXECUTIVE BRANCH AGENCIES; REPORT ON VOTER
REGISTRATION OPPORTUNITIES
(a) On or before November 15, 2025, the following departments and
agencies shall submit a written report to the House Committee on Government
Operations and Military Affairs and the Senate Committee on Government
Operations that lists and describes any of the department’s or agency’s
application forms that may be updated to include automatic voter registration:
(1) Agency of Human Services;
(2) Agency of Education;
(3) Department of Labor;
(4) Agency of Commerce and Community Development;
(5) Department for Children and Families; and
(6) Department of Health.
(b) Each department and agency shall include in its report a description of
how the department’s or agency’s application or registration systems may be
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 4 of 25
integrated with the State’s voter registration system. The report shall also
include a proposed timeline for implementing voter registration into the
systems.
* * * Preregistration for Young Voters * * *
Sec. 4. 17 V.S.A. § 2121 is amended to read:
§ 2121. ELIGIBILITY OF VOTERS
(a) Any person may register to vote in the town of his or her the person’s
residence in any election held in a political subdivision of this State in which
he or she the person resides who, on election day:
(1) is a citizen of the United States;
(2) is a resident of the State of Vermont;
(3) has taken the voter’s oath; and
(4) is 18 years of age or more.
(b) Any person meeting the requirements of subdivisions (a)(1)–(3) of this
section who will be 18 years of age on or before the date of a general election
may register and vote in the primary election immediately preceding that
general election.
(c) Any person meeting the requirements of subdivisions (a)(1)–(3) of this
section who is 16 years of age may register to vote in Vermont, but shall not
vote in any election in the State unless the person is 18 years of age or under
qualifies under subsection (b) of this section.
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 5 of 25
* * * Campaign Finance * * *
Sec. 5. 17 V.S.A. § 2903 is amended to read:
§ 2903. PENALTIES
(a) A person who knowingly and intentionally violates a provision of
subchapter 2, 3, or 4 of this chapter shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 or
imprisoned not more than six months, or both.
* * *
Sec. 6. 17 V.S.A. § 2964 is amended to read:
§ 2964. CAMPAIGN REPORTS; CANDIDATES FOR STATE OFFICE,
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, AND COUNTY OFFICE;
POLITICAL COMMITTEES; POLITICAL PARTIES
(a)(1) Each candidate for State office, the General Assembly, or a two-
year-term county office who has rolled over any amount of surplus into his or
her the candidate’s new campaign or who has made expenditures or accepted
contributions of $500.00 or more during the two-year general election cycle
and, except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, each political
committee that has not filed a final report pursuant to subsection 2965(b) of
this chapter, and each political party required to register under section 2923 of
this chapter shall file with the Secretary of State campaign finance reports as
follows:
* * *
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 6 of 25
(2) Each candidate for a four-year-term county office who has rolled
over any amount of surplus into his or her the candidate’s new campaign or
who has made expenditures or accepted contributions of $500.00 or more
during the four-year general election cycle shall file with the Secretary of State
campaign finance reports as follows:
* * *
(b)(1) A political committee or a political party that has accepted
contributions or made expenditures of $1,000.00 or more during the local
election cycle for the purpose of influencing a local election or supporting or
opposing one or more candidates in a local election shall file with the Secretary
of State campaign finance reports regarding that local election 30 days before,
10 days before, and two weeks after the local election.
* * *
(c) The failure of a candidate, political committee, or political party to file a
report under this section shall be deemed an affirmative statement that a report
is not required of the candidate, political committee, or political party under
this section A candidate, political committee, or political party that is not
otherwise required to file a report pursuant to this section shall file with the
Secretary of State a report and affirmative statement that the candidate,
political committee, or political party has not made expenditures or accepted
contributions in the amounts specified in this section.
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 7 of 25
Sec. 7. 17 V.S.A. § 2974 is added to read:
§ 2974. DELINQUENT FILING; PENALTIES
(a) If any registration, report, or disclosure is not filed in the time and
manner required by this chapter:
(1) The Office of the Secretary of State shall issue a notice of
delinquency to the candidate for any registration, report, or disclosure required
of a candidate in the time and manner required by this chapter.
(2) The candidate shall have five-business-days from the date that the
Office of the Secretary of State issues the notice to cure the delinquency.
(3) Immediately following the five business day period, the delinquent
candidate shall pay a $10.00 penalty for each subsequent day that the
registration, report, or disclosure remains delinquent. For an individual
delinquent filing, the total amount of penalties imposed pursuant to this section
shall not exceed $1,000.00.
(4) Notwithstanding subdivision (3) of this subsection, the Secretary of
State may reduce or waive any penalty imposed under this section if the
candidate demonstrates good cause, as determined by the Secretary of State.
(b) The Office of the Secretary of State shall send a notice of delinquency
to the email address provided by the candidate in the candidate’s consent of
candidate form.
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 8 of 25
(c) The Secretary of State may utilize remedies available to a claimant
agency under 32 V.S.A. chapter 151, subchapter 12 to collect any unpaid
penalty.
(d)(1) A candidate who files a report or disclosure with intent to defraud,
falsify, conceal, or cover up by any trick, scheme, or device a material fact; or,
with intent to defraud, make any false, fictitious, or fraudulent claim or
representation as to a material fact; or, with intent to defraud, make or use any
writing or document knowing the same to contain any false, fictitious, or
fraudulent claim or entry as to a material fact shall be considered to have made
a false claim for the purposes of 13 V.S.A. § 3016.
(2) Pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 1223 and section 2904a of this title,
complaints regarding any candidate who fails to properly file a registration,
report, or disclosure required under this chapter may be filed with the Office of
the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall refer complaints to the
Attorney General or to the State’s Attorney of jurisdiction for investigation, as
appropriate.
Sec. 8. REPEAL
17 V.S.A. chapter 61, subchapter 5 (campaign finance; public financing
option) is repealed.
Sec. 9. 17 V.S.A. chapter 61, subchapter 6 is added to read:
Subchapter 6. Public Financing Option
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 9 of 25
§ 2987. DEMOCRACY CERTIFICATE PROGRAM
(a) As used in this chapter, a “democracy certificate” means a document
sent to voters in this State that signifies that a certain amount of funding, as
determined by the General Assembly, is to be transferred from the Secretary of
State Fund to the candidate of the voter’s choosing pursuant to the provisions
of this subchapter.
(b) The democracy certificate program shall only be available for
candidates running for State office in a primary election or a general election.
The democracy certificate program shall not be available for special elections
or uncontested elections.
(c) A voter may opt into the democracy certificate program and obtain
democracy certificates by application to the Secretary of State if the individual
is eligible to vote under section 2121 of this title.
§ 2988. DEMOCRACY CERTIFICATE ISSUANCE
(a) The Secretary of State shall issue four democracy certificates, each
worth $25.00 in candidate financing, to each voter who has opted into the
democracy certificate program. The funds shall be disbursed to the assigned
candidates as set forth in section 2991 of this chapter.
(b)(1) Not later than the first business day in March, the Secretary of State
shall issue democracy certificates to each voter who has opted into the
democracy certificate program for the primary elections.
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 10 of 25
(2) Not later than the first business day in September, the Secretary of
State shall issue democracy certificates to each voter who has opted into the
democracy certificate program for the general elections.
(3) The Secretary of State shall either issue the democracy certificates
by mail or electronically through a secure Secretary of State online system.
The Secretary of State may prescribe ways in which voters may choose their
delivery preference.
§ 2989. DEMOCRACY CERTIFICATE ASSIGNMENT AND RECEIPT
(a) Democracy certificates are only assignable or transferable as stated in
this section.
(b) A voter who has opted into the democracy certificate program may
assign a democracy certificate by indicating the candidate of the voter’s choice
and signing the democracy certificate. A voter may only assign a democracy
certificate to a qualified candidate for the democracy certificate program in a
primary election or a general election for a State office.
(c) Town clerks shall receive, verify, and process all physical democracy
certificates mailed by the Secretary of State and submitted to the town clerks
by the voters of their respective towns. The Secretary of State shall receive,
verify, and process all democracy certificates submitted electronically through
a secure Secretary of State online system, if any.
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 11 of 25
(d) No democracy certificate shall be assigned after the last business day in
August for primary State office elections or the last business day in November
for general State office elections.
(e) No democracy certificate may be assigned to any candidate filing for
participation who then fails to qualify or becomes unqualified for the position
sought or for the democracy certificate program.
(f) A candidate participating in the democracy certificate program may
seek the assignment of voters’ democracy certificates personally or through a
representative.
(g) A voter’s valid assignment of a democracy certificate to a candidate is
irrevocable.
(h) Assignment or transfer of a democracy certificate for cash or any other
consideration is prohibited. Offering to purchase, buy, or sell a democracy
certificate is prohibited. No person shall give or gift a democracy certificate to
another individual, except by assigning it to a candidate as provided in this
section. In all cases, a democracy certificate assignment shall be deemed
invalid or revocable if the assignment was the result of threats, coercion, or
physical duress.
§ 2990. CANDIDATE QUALIFICATION
(a) Only a candidate who is qualified to participate in the democracy
certificate program may receive an assignment of a democracy certificate and
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 12 of 25
disbursement of public finance funds. A candidate is qualified to participate in
the democracy certificate program if the candidate meets all the requirements
of this subchapter and any related rules adopted by the Secretary of State. The
Secretary of State shall determine, in the Secretary’s sole discretion, any
questions regarding whether a candidate has met the requirements of this
subchapter and shall confirm publicly and with the candidate if the candidate
does qualify for the democracy certificate program.
(b) Only an individual eligible for and seeking an elected State office
position shall be eligible to file for democracy certificate program
participation.
(c) The democracy certificate program shall not be available for special
elections.
(d) A candidate for State office who intends to seek public finance funds
from the Secretary of State Services Fund shall file a Vermont campaign
finance affidavit on or before the date on which primary petitions or general
election petitions must be filed, regardless of whether the candidate seeks to
enter a party primary, is an independent candidate, or seeks to enter the general
election.
(e) The Secretary of State shall prepare a Vermont campaign finance
affidavit form, informational materials on procedures and financial
requirements, and notification of the penalties for violation of this subchapter.
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 13 of 25
(f)(1) The Vermont campaign finance affidavit shall set forth the conditions
of receiving grants under this subchapter and provide space for the candidate to
agree that the candidate will abide by such conditions and all expenditure and
contribution limitations, reporting requirements, and other provisions of this
subchapter.
(2) The affidavit shall also state the candidate’s name; legal residence;
business or occupation; address of business or occupation; party affiliation, if
any; the office sought; and whether the candidate intends to enter a party
primary or the general election.
(3) The affidavit shall also contain a list of all contributions and other
sources of campaign funds received by the candidate to date.
(4) The Secretary of State may require further affirmation of
information submitted by the candidate on the affidavit, as deemed necessary
by the Secretary of State for the administration of this subchapter.
(5) The affidavit shall be sworn and subscribed to by the candidate.
(g) A candidate shall be disqualified from the democracy certificate
program by publicly withdrawing or otherwise abandoning the race, failing to
advance to the general election, or in the event that the Secretary of State, the
Attorney General, or a State’s Attorney determines that the candidate has
violated any election laws or democracy certificate program requirements,
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 14 of 25
such as violation of campaign fund limitation or contribution limit laws, or
fraudulent or attempted fraudulent assignment of democracy certificates.
(h) A candidate participating in the democracy certificate program shall:
(1) participate in at least three debates or similar public events for
primary and general elections each;
(2) not knowingly solicit money for or on behalf of any political action
committee, political party, or any organization that will make an independent
expenditure for or against any candidate for State office within the same
election cycle; and
(3) not solicit or accept total contributions from any individual or entity
in excess of $2,000.00 during one election cycle, but excluding the value of
democracy certificates assigned to such candidate.
(i) The Secretary of State shall publish and maintain a list of democracy
certificate program participants to be readily accessible by the public and on
the Secretary of State’s website.
§ 2991. DISBURSEMENT OF PUBLIC FINANCE FUNDS
(a) After receiving a democracy certificate pursuant to section 2987 of this
title, the Secretary of State shall disburse the value of the certificate proceeds
only if:
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 15 of 25
(1) disbursement of public finance funds shall not make a qualified
candidate exceed the maximum campaign fund limitation pursuant to
section 2941 of this chapter;
(2) public finance funds are available;
(3) the Town Clerk verifies that a voter has returned the physical
democracy certificate with the assigned serial number through a secure
democracy certificate drop box; and
(4) the Secretary of State has verified that a voter has electronically
returned the democracy certificate with the assigned serial number through a
secure Secretary of State online system.
(b) The Secretary shall not disburse the payment of public finance funds if
any of the following circumstances apply:
(1) the voter is no longer registered within this State;
(2) the candidate is deceased, is disqualified from the democracy
certificate program, has dropped out, or has failed to use the democracy
certificate;
(3) the candidate does not qualify or has violated the qualification
requirements of the democracy certificate program;
(4) after the first business day in the month of September, a candidate in
a primary election for State office does not advance to the general election; or
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 16 of 25
(5) after the first business day of the month of December, a candidate in
a general election for State office does not win the general election.
(c)(1) The Secretary of State shall make disbursements from the Secretary
of State Services Fund to candidates who have qualified for public finance
funds under this subchapter.
(2) To cover any public finance funds to democracy certificate program
participants under this subchapter, the Secretary of State shall report to the
Commissioner of Finance and Management, who shall anticipate receipts to
the Services Fund and issue warrants to pay for those funds. The
Commissioner shall report any such anticipated receipts and warrants issued
under this subdivision to the Joint Fiscal Committee on or before December 1
of the year in which the warrants were issued.
(d) A candidate participating in the democracy certificate program may be
assigned democracy certificates for the general election before the primary
election takes place and may allocate democracy certificates to the general
election without such certificates counting against the maximum campaign
fund limitation for the primary election.
(e) Public finance funds disbursed in a primary election period but not
expended by the candidate in the primary election period may be expended by
the candidate in the general election period if the candidate has won the
candidate’s primary election.
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 17 of 25
(f) The Secretary of State shall disburse public finance funds to qualifying
candidates within 10 business days after verifying any validly assigned
democracy certificates.
(g) The monetary amounts contained in this subchapter shall be adjusted
for inflation pursuant to the Consumer Price Index as provided in section 2905
of this chapter.
§ 2992. CAMPAIGN FUND LIMITATIONS
(a) Candidates qualified to participate in the democracy certificate program
shall not exceed the following maximum campaign fund limitations for State
office:
(1) $1,000,000.00 in cumulative campaign funds for a candidate for
Governor; and
(2) $500,000.00 in cumulative campaign funds for a candidate for
Lieutenant Governor, State Treasurer, State Auditor, Attorney General, or
Secretary of State.
(b) A candidate participating in the democracy certificate program shall
report to the Secretary of State when the maximum campaign fund limitation
for a candidate described in subsection (a) of this section is met or surpassed.
(c) The affidavit shall also contain a list of all the candidate’s contributions
to date together with the name and town of residence of the contributor and the
date each contribution was made.
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 18 of 25
§ 2993. ACCOUNTABILITY
(a) The Secretary of State shall publish the democracy certificate program
information so that the public may track assignments of democracy certificates
and disbursements of public finance funds.
(b) If a voter believes the voter’s democracy certificate was lost, stolen, or
fraudulently or improperly assigned, the Secretary of State may provide relief
as the Secretary of State deems appropriate, including democracy certificate
replacement, cancellation of assignment, or requiring reimbursement from a
candidate to the Secretary of State Fund of any prior disbursed democracy
certificate program funds.
§ 2994. ADMINISTRATION
(a) Administration by Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall
implement and administer the democracy certificate program, public finance
funds, and the provisions of this subchapter, including adopting rules and
creating forms, information packets, procedures, and enforcement mechanisms
as necessary.
(b) Publication of materials. Prior to distributing democracy certificates,
the Secretary of State shall inform the public about the democracy certificate
program. The Secretary of State shall publish appropriate guidebooks for
candidates and democracy certificates recipients, and all forms, instructions,
brochures, and documents necessary for the program, which shall include
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 19 of 25
making key documents accessible to those with visual or other disabilities, and
translations into languages other than English spoken by Vermont residents.
(c) Democracy Certificate Program Fund Limits. On or before January 1
of each State office election year, the Secretary of State shall set and publish
the Democracy Certificate Program Fund Limit for that year for democracy
certificate disbursements. In setting the Democracy Certificate Program Fund
Limit, the Secretary of State shall work to reasonably project and ensure that
adequate funds are available for that election year consistent with this
subchapter and its goals and purposes.
(d) Funding amount. During any State office election year, as soon as the
Secretary of State receives or reasonably believes the Secretary of State shall
receive assigned democracy certificates in excess of available public finance
funds, then funds shall be deemed unavailable, and the Secretary of State shall
publicly announce the same and, notwithstanding any provision of this
subchapter to the contrary, set a new date by which assigned democracy
certificates must be submitted. After the new date, the Secretary of State,
considering democracy certificates are received and there are available funds,
shall allocate the remaining available public finance funds to each assigned
candidate among all participating candidates for all State offices proportionate
to the number of assigned democracy certificates for which public finance
funds have not yet been disbursed.
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 20 of 25
§ 2995. VIOLATIONS
(a) A person who knowingly and intentionally violates any provision of
this subchapter is subject to the penalties listed in section 2903 of this chapter.
(b) A person violates this subchapter if the person knowingly and
intentionally purchases, buys, sells, pays, or receives consideration for any
democracy certificate or attempts to do so. Further, a person shall be in
violation of this subchapter if the person attempts to sell or dispense a stolen
democracy certificate registered to another voter.
(c) A person violates this subchapter if the person knowingly and
intentionally receives, possesses, conceals, or destroys any democracy
certificate assigned by a voter.
(d) A person violates this subchapter if the person knowingly and
intentionally does the following:
(1) falsely makes or draws a complete or incomplete democracy
certificate that purports to be authentic but is not authentic, either because the
ostensible maker is fictitious or because, if real, the person did not authorize
the making or drawing or signing of the democracy certificate;
(2) falsely completes a democracy certificate assignment by adding or
inserting matter, including a forged signature, without the authority of the
person entitled to assign the democracy certificate; or
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 21 of 25
(3) falsely alters a democracy certificate, without authorization by the
holder or recipient of the democracy certificate entitled to grant it, by means of
erasure, obliteration, deletion, insertion of new matter, transposition of matter,
or in any other manner.
(e) A candidate who violates any provision of this section may be
disqualified from participating in the democracy certificate program for that
election cycle, in the sole discretion of the Secretary of State.
§ 2996. REPORTING
Annually, on or before January 15, the Secretary of State shall report to the
House Committee on Government Operations and Military Affairs and the
Senate Committee on Government Operations with the Secretary of State’s
recommendations for maximum campaign limits, contribution limitations,
prior and projected democracy certificate program funding needs to ensure
proper accumulation, distribution of funds during nonelection and election
years, and any recommendations for legislative action.
§ 2997. DESIGN OF DEMOCRACY CERTIFICATE
(a) The Secretary of State shall design the democracy certificates.
(b) The Secretary of State shall print the following either on the face of the
physical democracy certificates or in digital form if democracy certificates are
to be electronically submitted via a secure Secretary of State online system:
“Democracy Certificates of __________”
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 22 of 25
(print your name)
I, ___________, solemnly swear or affirm that I am a resident of the town
(city) of _________, State of Vermont, and that I am a legal voter in this town
(city).
_________________________________________
(your signature)
(c) The Secretary of State shall include an identification number for each
issued democracy certificate.
(d) The Secretary of State shall print in which election or elections the
democracy certificate may be assigned to candidates.
(e) The Secretary of State shall prepare and furnish democracy certificate
forms and any supporting documentation for the democracy certificate
program.
Sec. 10. 17 V.S.A. § 2998 is added to read:
§ 2998. RULEMAKING
The Secretary of State shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 for
the administration and implementation of the democracy certificate program,
including:
(1) issuance of democracy certificates to voters who opt into the
democracy voucher program and disbursements to qualified candidates; and
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 23 of 25
(2) the receipt of duplicate democracy certificates and procedures for
mitigating instances of loss, theft, destruction, or forgery of democracy
certificates.
* * * Employer-Provided Time off for Statewide Election Days * * *
Sec. 11. 21 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 13 is added to read:
Subchapter 13. Rights of Voters
§ 571. VOTERS
(a) Time off. Each employer in this State shall permit any employee, upon
24 hours advanced notice to the employee, to take up to four hours off from
employment to vote in person in any local, municipal, district, county, State, or
federal primary, general, or special election for which such employee is
qualified; provided, however, the employer need not grant time off for voting
if the hours of work of an employee commence at least two hours after the
opening of the polls or end at least two hours prior to the closing of the polls.
(b) Scheduled time. An employer may specify the scheduled working
hours during which the employee may take time off to vote described in
subsection (a) of this section.
(c) Discipline and benefits. An employer shall not discharge, penalize or
otherwise discipline, or deprive the employee of any right, privilege, or benefit
in a manner that discriminates between the employee and other employees not
voting, because of the employee’s voting in accordance with this section.
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 24 of 25
(d) Replacements. An employer shall not require an employee to find a
replacement for time off taken to vote as described in subsection (a) of this
section.
(e) Compensation.
(1) An employer shall not require an employee who is absent from work
in accordance with this section to use earned or accrued leave times described
in this chapter.
(2) An employer shall not be required to pay an employee who is absent
from work in accordance with this section for the time absent unless the
employer and the employee mutually agree that either:
(A) the employee will work an equivalent number of hours as the
number of hours for which the employee is absent during the same pay period;
or
(B) the employee will trade hours with a second employee so that the
second employee works during the hours for which the employee is absent and
the employee works an equivalent number of hours in place of the second
employee during the same pay period.
(f) Posted notice. An employer shall post notice of the provisions of this
section in a form provided by the Commissioner in a place conspicuous to
employees at the employer’s place of business. An employer shall also notify
VT LEG #381107 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.98
2025 Page 25 of 25
an employee of the provisions of this section at the time of the employee’s
hiring.
(g) Penalty. An employer who violates a provision of this section shall be
fined not more than $200.00.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 12. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381107 v.1